Washington statutes.
RCW 43.131.130

Legislature—Powers unaffected by enactment of chapter. (Expires June 30, 2025.)

Nothing in this chapter or RCW 43.06.010 shall prevent the legislature from abolishing or modifying an entity scheduled for termination prior to the entity's established termination date or from abolishing or modifying any other entity.

[ 2000 c 189 s 9; 1977 ex.s. c 289 s 13.]